Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2504
Violations; penalty; enforcement duties.

(1) After being notified by the department that a plastic bottle or rigid plastic container does not comply with section 69-2503 or the rules and regulations promulgated under such section, a person violating such section shall be subject to a civil penalty of fifty dollars for each violation up to a maximum of five hundred dollars and may be enjoined from further violations.

(2) For any violation of section 69-2503 or the rules and regulations promulgated under the Plastic Container Coding Act, the Attorney General or county attorney shall institute proceedings to recover the civil penalty imposed under this section.

Laws 1993, LB 63, § 4.